Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-253
Commission; enforcement.

The commission may conduct investigations and shall enforce the Automatic Dialing-Announcing Devices Act. Upon written complaint and supporting affidavit that an applicable law, rule, or regulation has been or is being violated, the commission may enter a cease and desist order on an ex parte basis against the party named in the complaint. The order shall have duration of no more than twenty days, and a hearing upon the complaint shall be held no later than twenty days after the order is entered. In addition to any criminal or other penalties, failure to comply with an applicable law, rule, or regulation shall constitute grounds for revocation or suspension of a permit.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1217;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 115.